Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-28,116
Drug product selection; rules and regulations; department; duty.

(1) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement the Nebraska Drug Product Selection Act upon the joint recommendation of the Board of Medicine and Surgery and the Board of Pharmacy.

(2) The department shall maintain a link on its website to the current list of all biological products that the federal Food and Drug Administration has determined to be interchangeable biological products.

Laws 2003, LB 667, § 21;

R.S.1943, (2009), § 71-5409;

Laws 2015, LB37, § 67;

Laws 2017, LB481, § 16.